California, session 20252026, AB734.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25544 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25544. (a) For the purposes of this section, “biological resources data” means information pertaining to species and their habitats, including, but not limited to, observations, surveys, scientific studies, species needs, and habitat conditions, and including maps on a scale of one inch equals 500 feet.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any biological resources data submitted to the commission as part of an application for certification pursuant to this chapter, or exemption from this chapter pursuant to Section 25541, shall be made available to the public on the commission’s docket as part of a certification proceeding unless the Department of Fish and Wildlife makes a written determination that the data to be made public includes location data derived from the California Natural Diversity Database, the disclosure of which would pose a significant risk to individuals of the species. If the Department of Fish and Wildlife makes that determination, it shall include in the written determination an assessment of the maximum amount of data from the California Natural Diversity Database that can be released without posing a significant risk to the species. The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall provide its written determination to the commission, and the commission shall make the data available to the public on its docket in accordance with the determination. SEC. 2. Section 25545.17 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25545.17. (a) For the purposes of this section, “biological resources data” means information pertaining to species and their habitats, including, but not limited to, observations, surveys, scientific studies, species needs, and habitat conditions, and including maps on a scale of one inch equals 500 feet.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any biological resources data submitted to the commission as part of an application for certification pursuant to this chapter shall be made available to the public on the commission’s docket as part of a certification proceeding unless the Department of Fish and Wildlife makes a written determination that the data to be made public includes location data derived from the California Natural Diversity Database, the disclosure of which would pose a significant risk to individuals of the species. If the Department of Fish and Wildlife makes that determination, it shall include in the written determination an assessment of the maximum amount of data from the California Natural Diversity Database that can be released without posing a significant risk to the species. The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall provide its written determination to the commission, and the commission shall make the data available to the public on its docket in accordance with the determination.